Hawaii statutes.
§577-10 Court having jurisdiction. The
family courts shall have exclusive jurisdiction of all cases coming within
sections 709-902, 709-903, 709-904, and 709-905; provided that upon complaint
made to any prosecuting officer of the commission of any offense coming within
sections 709-902, 709-903, 709-904, and 709-905, the district judge within
whose circuit the offense is alleged to have been committed may issue the
judge's warrant for the arrest of the person accused of such offense, and
commit the accused to the family court for the required proceedings. [L 1925, c
167, pt of §1; am L 1929, c 126, §1; RL 1935, §4517; am L 1943, c 223, §1; RL
1945, §12267; am L 1945, c 142, §5; RL 1955, §330-8; am imp L 1965, c 232, §1;
HRS §577-10; am L 1973, c 211, §2(b); gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next